Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 23.30.230.
Persons not covered.

The following persons are not covered by this chapter:

a part-time babysitter;

a cleaning person;

harvest help and similar part-time or transient help;

a person employed as a sports official on a contractual basis and who officiates only at sports events in which the players are not compensated; in this paragraph, “sports official” includes an umpire, referee, judge, scorekeeper, timekeeper, organizer, or other person who is a neutral participant in a sports event;

a person employed as an entertainer on a contractual basis;

a commercial fisherman, as defined in AS

16.05.940

;

an individual who drives a taxicab and whose compensation and written contractual arrangement is as described in AS

23.10.055(a)(13)

, unless the hours worked by the individual or the areas in which the individual may work are restricted except to comply with local ordinances;

a participant in the Alaska temporary assistance program (AS 47.27) who is engaged in work activities required under AS

47.27.035

other than subsidized or unsubsidized work or on-the-job training;

a person employed as a player or coach by a professional hockey team if the person is covered under a health care insurance plan provided by the professional hockey team, the coverage is applicable to both work-related and nonwork-related injuries, and the coverage provides medical and related benefits as required under this chapter, except that coverage may not be limited to two years from the date of injury as described under AS

23.30.095(a)

; in this paragraph, “health care insurance” has the meaning given in AS

21.12.050

;

a person working as a qualified real estate licensee who performs services under a written contract that provides that the person will not be treated as an employee for federal income tax or workers’ compensation purposes; in this paragraph, “qualified real estate licensee” means a person who is required to be licensed under AS

08.88.161

and whose payment for services is directly related to sales or other output rather than the number of hours worked;

a transportation network company driver who provides a prearranged ride or is otherwise logged onto the digital network of a transportation network company as a driver; and

a person employed as an independent contractor; a person is an independent contractor for the purposes of this section only if the person

has an express contract to perform the services;

is free from direction and control over the means and manner of providing services, subject only to the right of the individual for whom, or entity for which, the services are provided to specify the desired results, completion schedule, or range of work hours, or to monitor the work for compliance with contract plans and specifications, or federal, state, or municipal law;

incurs most of the expenses for tools, labor, and other operational costs necessary to perform the services, except that materials and equipment may be supplied;

has an opportunity for profit and loss as a result of the services performed for the other individual or entity;

is free to hire and fire employees to help perform the services for the contracted work;

has all business, trade, or professional licenses required by federal, state, or municipal authorities for a business or individual engaging in the same type of services as the person;

follows federal Internal Revenue Service requirements by

obtaining an employer identification number, if required;

filing business or self-employment tax returns for the previous tax year to report profit or income earned for the same type of services provided under the contract; or

intending to file business or self-employment tax returns for the current tax year to report profit or income earned for the same type of services provided under the contract if the person’s business was not operating in the previous tax year; and

meets at least two of the following criteria:

the person is responsible for the satisfactory completion of services that the person has contracted to perform and is subject to liability for a failure to complete the contracted work, or maintains liability insurance or other insurance policies necessary to protect the employees, financial interests, and customers of the person’s business;

the person maintains a business location or a business mailing address separate from the location of the individual for whom, or the entity for which, the services are performed;

the person provides contracted services for two or more different customers within a 12-month period or engages in any kind of business advertising, solicitation, or other marketing efforts reasonably calculated to obtain new contracts to provide similar services.

The exclusion of certain persons under (a) of this section may not be construed to require inclusion of other persons as employees for purposes of compensation under this chapter.

In this section,

“digital network” has the meaning given in AS

28.23.180

;

“on-the-job training” means training provided by an employer under a formal agreement with a department of the state, or an agent of a department, for which wages are paid by the employer to a participant in the Alaska temporary assistance program (AS 47.27) while the participant receives job training;

“prearranged ride” has the meaning given in AS

28.23.180

;

“subsidized work” means employment, by an employer, of an Alaska temporary assistance program participant in a work placement for which the participant receives wages from the employer, subsidized by, and subject to an agreement between the employer and, a department of the state or an agent of a department; “subsidized work” does not include community work service, job sampling placements, or preplacement activities such as job readiness assessments, job searches, education, or vocational training;

“transportation network company” has the meaning given in AS 28.23.180;

“transportation network company driver” or “driver” has the meaning given in AS 28.23.180.

“unsubsidized work” means employment, by an employer, secured by an Alaska temporary assistance program participant, with or without the assistance of a department of the state or an agent of a department, for which the participant receives wages from the employer; “unsubsidized work” does not include self-employment.

History.

(§ 33(3) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 13 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1994; am §§ 3, 4 ch 45 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 2006; am §§ 4, 5 ch 10 SLA 2017; am § 17 ch 91 SLA 2018; am § 78 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraph (a)(6) was enacted as (b).
Renumbered as (a)(5) and minor word changes made in 1986. Renumbered again as (a)(6) in the 1994 amendment.

In 2005, in paragraph (a)(7), “AS

23.10.055

(a)(13)” was substituted for “AS

23.10.055

(13)” to reflect the addition of AS

23.10.055(b)

and (c) by § 2, ch. 90, SLA 2005.

Paragraphs (c)(1), (3), (5), and (6) were enacted as (c)(4) — (7); renumbered in 2017, at which time former paragraphs (c)(1) — (3) were renumbered as (c)(2), (4), and (7).

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective June 16, 2017, added (a)(11), and made a related change; added (c)(4) — (7) [now (c)(1), (3), (5), and (6)].

The 2018 amendment, effective November 22, 2018, added (a)(12), and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, made a stylistic change in (a)(1), in (a)(7) inserted “and” following “taxicab”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where a floating processor works exclusively outside of Alaska territorial waters, Jones Act remedies are available to injured employees, but where an employee vessel has significant contacts with a state, it probably will be necessary for the employer to provide for workers’ compensation coverage. January 26, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.30.235.
Cases in which no compensation is payable.

Compensation under this chapter may not be allowed for an injury

proximately caused by the employee’s wilful intent to injure or kill any person;

proximately caused by intoxication of the injured employee or proximately caused by the employee being under the influence of drugs unless the drugs were taken as prescribed by the employee’s physician.

History.

(§ 33(2) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 20 ch 93 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.30.236.
Members of the organized militia as employees.

A member of the organized militia who has been ordered into active state service by the governor under AS

26.05.070

or ordered into training under AS

26.05.100

, and who suffers an injury, disability, or death in the line of duty, is an employee of the state for purposes of this chapter.

The gross weekly earnings for members of the organized militia are calculated using the methods prescribed under AS

26.05.260(h)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 83, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on November 11, 2018.

Sec. 23.30.237.
High school students in work-study programs as employees of the state.

An individual who is enrolled for credit at a public high school in a course that combines academic instruction with work experience outside the school for a public or private nonprofit employer is an employee of the state for the purposes of this chapter while the individual is performing the work experience.
Weekly compensation for disability or death under this section may not be less than the initial payment of compensation under AS

23.30.175

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 65 SLA 1980)

Sec. 23.30.238.
Volunteer emergency medical technicians as employees.

A person who is injured during the course and within the scope of providing service as a volunteer emergency medical technician is an employee of the state for purposes of this chapter if the person

is certified by the state under AS 18.08 as an emergency medical technician or is an active roster volunteer member of a state certified emergency medical service and is registered with the Department of Health and Social Services;

provides emergency medical service outside an incorporated city or borough; and

is not otherwise covered for that injury by an employer’s workers’ compensation insurance policy or self-insurance certificate.

The gross weekly earnings for a person receiving benefits under this section shall be the minimum gross weekly earnings paid a full-time emergency medical technician employed in the city or borough nearest to the place where the injury occurred, or, if the nearest city or borough has no full-time emergency medical technician, at a reasonable figure previously set by the nearest city or borough to make this determination, but in no case may the gross weekly earnings for calculating compensation be less than the minimum wage computed on the basis of 40 hours of work a week.

History.

(§ 1 ch 25 SLA 1992)

Sec. 23.30.239.
Sole proprietors and partners as employees.

A person who is a sole proprietor, or a member of a partnership, may elect coverage as an employee under this chapter by making written application to an insurer. The insurer may accept the application and fix an assumed monthly wage at which the person shall be carried on the payroll for purposes of this chapter.

When the application is accepted, the person is subject to the provisions and entitled to the benefits of this chapter. The person shall promptly notify the insurer whenever there is a change in the status of the person as a sole proprietor or partner.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

23.30.120(a)

, a person covered under (a) of this section bears the burden of proof of the validity of the claim.

A person who has elected coverage under (a) of this section may cancel the election by giving written notice to the insurer. Notwithstanding AS

23.30.030

(5), the cancellation becomes effective the day following the filing of notice with the insurer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 47 SLA 1986)

Sec. 23.30.240.
Officers of corporations, municipal corporations, and nonprofit corporations, and members of limited liability companies as employees.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, an executive officer elected or appointed and empowered in accordance with the charter and bylaws of a corporation or a member of a limited liability company organized under AS 10.50 is not an employee of the business entity under this chapter if the executive officer or member owns at least 10 percent of the business entity. Except as provided in (b) of this section, an executive officer of a municipal corporation or charitable, religious, educational, or other nonprofit corporation is not an employee of the corporation under this chapter.

Any type of corporation or limited liability company may bring an executive officer or a member exempted under (a) of this section within the coverage of the business entity’s insurance contract by specifically including the executive officer or member in the contract of insurance. The election to bring the executive officer or member within the business entity’s coverage continues in force for the period during which the contract of insurance is in effect. During that period, an executive officer or a member brought within the coverage of the insurance contract is an employee of the business entity under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2(8) ch 193 SLA 1959; am ch 148 SLA 1962; am §§ 59, 60 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am § 18 ch 91 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the changes to this section by sec. 18, ch. 91, SLA 2018, effective August 1, 2019, to an insurance policy or contract, see sec. 24(b), ch. 91, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2019, rewrote the section.

Sec. 23.30.241.
Special officers as employees.

A special officer appointed under AS

18.65.010(a)

is considered an employee under this chapter only when the person is actually traveling or working as a special officer. The weekly wage earned in the special officer’s regular employment shall be used in computing the amount of compensation to be awarded. If a special officer has no regular employment, the minimum wage paid a full-time state trooper shall be used in computing the amount of compensation to be awarded.

Annual appropriations to fund the coverage provided for in (a) of this section shall be provided for in the budget of the Department of Public Safety.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 1978)

Sec. 23.30.242.
Members of state boards and commissions as employees.

A member of a state board or commission is considered an employee under this chapter only while the member is actually traveling or working as a member of the board or commission. The maximum weekly wage shall be used in computing the amount of compensation to be awarded.

Annual appropriations to fund the coverage provided for in (a) of this section shall be provided for in the budget of the Office of the Governor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 1969; am § 54 ch 69 SLA 1970)

Sec. 23.30.243.
Extending coverage to certain firefighters.

For the purposes of workers’ compensation any injury, disability or death incurred by a firefighter by reason of the firefighter’s participation in authorized training, proceeding to or engaging in a fire suppression or rescue operation, or the protection or preservation of life or property, anywhere in the state is considered to have arisen out of and been sustained in the course of employment, and the fire department or regularly organized volunteer fire department of the firefighter’s primary employment or registration is considered to be the employer, except when the injured, at the time of injury or death, is acting for compensation from another.

Nothing in this section requires the extension of benefits to a firefighter employed by a municipality which by law or regulation expressly prohibits the activity giving rise to the injury, disability, or death.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the term “fire fighter” was substituted for “fireman” in this section under § 60, ch. 50, SLA 1989.

Sec. 23.30.244.
Emergency and disaster relief forces as state employees.

A resident of this state temporarily engaged as a civilian volunteer in an emergency or a disaster relief function in another state or country who suffers injury or death during the course and within the scope of providing emergency or disaster relief aid is considered an employee of this state for purposes of this chapter if, at the time of the injury or death, the volunteer

is an active roster civilian volunteer member of a state-certified emergency force and is registered with the state division of homeland security and emergency management in the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs;

is providing services under AS

26.23.136

during an emergency or disaster; and

is not otherwise covered for that injury or death by an employer’s workers’ compensation insurance policy or self-insurance certificate.

A resident of this state temporarily engaged as a civilian volunteer in a disaster emergency relief function in this state who suffers injury or death during the course and within the scope of providing disaster emergency relief aid is considered an employee of the state for purposes of this chapter if, at the time of the injury or death, the volunteer

is an active roster civilian volunteer member of an emergency service organization whose services were requested by the division of homeland security and emergency management in the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs;

is providing services requested by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs during a disaster emergency declared under AS

26.20.040

or AS

26.23.020

;

is not an employee of an agency of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this state; and

is not otherwise covered for that injury or death by an employer’s workers’ compensation insurance policy or self-insurance certificate.

The gross weekly earnings for a resident of this state temporarily engaged as a civilian volunteer under this section are the minimum gross weekly earnings paid to an employee employed by this state to perform equivalent work, or, if an employee is not employed by this state to perform equivalent work, the state average weekly wage, but the gross weekly earnings for calculating compensation may not be less than the minimum wage computed on the basis of 40 hours of work a week.

History.

(§ 1 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 39 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (a)(1) and (b)(1) of this section, “division of emergency services” was changed to “division of homeland security and emergency management” in accordance with § 26(b), ch. 179, SLA 2004.

Sec. 23.30.245.
Invalid agreements.

An agreement by an employee to pay a portion of the premium paid by the employer to a carrier or to contribute to a benefit fund or department maintained by the employer for the purpose of providing compensation or medical services and supplies as required by this chapter is not valid. An employer who makes a deduction for this purpose from the pay of an employee entitled to the benefits of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.

An agreement by an employee to waive the right to compensation under this chapter is not valid.

History.

(§ 14 ch 193 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.30.246.
Search and rescue personnel as state employees.

A resident of the state who temporarily volunteers to participate in a search and rescue training exercise or a search and rescue activity and who suffers injury or death during the course and within the scope of training for or providing search and rescue services is considered an employee of the state for purposes of this chapter if, at the time of the injury or death, the volunteer

is an authorized participant in a search and rescue training exercise under AS

18.60.115

or a search and rescue activity under AS

18.60.120

; and

is not otherwise covered for that injury or death by an employer’s workers’ compensation insurance policy or self-insurance certificate.

Notwithstanding the methods for calculating an employee’s gross weekly earnings under AS

23.30.220

, the gross weekly earnings for a resident of the state temporarily engaged as a volunteer under (a) of this section are equal to the state average weekly wage.

History.

(§ 6 ch 98 SLA 2008)

Effective dates. —

Section 6, ch. 98, SLA 2008, which enacted this section, became effective September 14, 2008.

Sec. 23.30.247.
Discrimination prohibited.

An employer may not discriminate in hiring, promotion, or retention policies or practices against an employee who has in good faith filed a claim for or received benefits under this chapter. An employer who violates this section is liable to the employee for damages to be assessed by the court in a private civil action.

This section may not be construed to prevent an employer from basing hiring, promotion, or retention policies or practices on considerations of the employee’s safety practices or the employee’s physical and mental abilities; nor may this section be construed so as to create employment rights not otherwise in existence.

This section may not be construed to prohibit an employer from requiring a prospective employee to fill out a preemployment questionnaire or application regarding the person’s prior health or disability history as long as it is meant to determine whether the employee has the physical or mental capacity to meet the documented physical or mental demands of the work.

History.

(§ 40 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 19 ch 91 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 1, 2018, in (c), deleted “either document written notice for second injury fund reimbursement under AS

23.30.205(c)

or” following “as it is meant to”.

Collateral references. —

Recovery for discharge from employment in retaliation for filing workers’ compensation claim. 32 ALR4th 1221.

Sec. 23.30.250.
Penalties for fraudulent or misleading acts; damages in civil actions.

A person who (1) knowingly makes a false or misleading statement, representation, or submission related to a benefit under this chapter; (2) knowingly assists, abets, solicits, or conspires in making a false or misleading submission affecting the payment, coverage, or other benefit under this chapter; (3) knowingly misclassifies employees or engages in deceptive leasing practices for the purpose of evading full payment of workers’ compensation insurance premiums; or (4) employs or contracts with a person or firm to coerce or encourage an individual to file a fraudulent compensation claim is civilly liable to a person adversely affected by the conduct, is guilty of theft by deception as defined in AS

11.46.180

, and may be punished as provided by AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.150

.

If the board, after a hearing, finds that a person has obtained compensation, medical treatment, or another benefit provided under this chapter, or that a provider has received a payment, by knowingly making a false or misleading statement or representation for the purpose of obtaining that benefit, the board shall order that person to make full reimbursement of the cost of all benefits obtained. Upon entry of an order authorized under this subsection, the board shall also order that person to pay all reasonable costs and attorney fees incurred by the employer and the employer’s carrier in obtaining an order under this section and in defending any claim made for benefits under this chapter. If a person fails to comply with an order of the board requiring reimbursement of compensation and payment of costs and attorney fees, the employer may declare the person in default and proceed to collect any sum due as provided under AS

23.30.170(b)

and (c).

To the extent allowed by law, in a civil action under (a) of this section, an award of damages by a court or jury may include compensatory damages and an award of three times the amount of damages sustained by the person, subject to AS 09.17. Attorney fees may be awarded to a prevailing party as allowed by law.

History.

(§ 29 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 21 ch 93 SLA 1982; am § 11 ch 75 SLA 1995; am §§ 61, 62 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 23.30.255.
Penalty for failure to pay compensation.

An employer required to secure the payment of compensation under this chapter who fails to do so is guilty of a class B felony if the amount involved exceeds $25,000 or a class C felony if the amount involved is $25,000 or less. If the employer is a corporation, its president, secretary, and treasurer are also severally liable to the fine or imprisonment imposed for the failure of the corporation to secure the payment of compensation. The president, secretary, and treasurer are severally personally liable, jointly with the corporation, for the compensation or other benefit which accrues under this chapter in respect to an injury which happens to an employee of the corporation while it has failed to secure the payment of compensation as required by AS

23.30.075

.

An employer who knowingly transfers, sells, encumbers, assigns, or in any manner disposes of, conceals, secretes, or destroys any property after one of the employer’s employees has been injured within the scope of this chapter, with intent to avoid the payment of compensation under this chapter to the employee or the employee’s dependents, is guilty of a class B felony if the amount involved exceeds $25,000 or a class C felony if the amount involved is $25,000 or less. If the employer is a corporation, its president, secretary, and treasurer are also severally liable to the penalty of imprisonment as well as jointly liable with the corporation for the fine.

This section does not affect any other liability of the employer under this chapter.

History.

(§ 31 ch 193 SLA 1959; am §§ 22, 23 ch 93 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in subsection (b), “employee’s dependents” was substituted for “employer’s dependents” to correct an error that occurred in 1984 when personal pronouns were deleted pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982.

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for class B and C felonies, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.125

.

Sec. 23.30.260.
Penalty for receiving unapproved fees and soliciting.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable for each offense by a fine of not more than $1,000 or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both, if the person

receives a fee, other consideration, or a gratuity on account of any services rendered for representation or advice with respect to a claim, unless the consideration or gratuity is approved by the board or the court; or

makes it a business to solicit employment for a lawyer or for the person making the solicitation with respect to a claim or award for compensation.

Notwithstanding AS

23.30.145

and (a) of this section, approval of a fee is not required if

the fee does not exceed $300 and is a one-time-only charge to an employee by an attorney licensed in this state who performed legal services with respect to the employee’s claim but did not enter an appearance; or

the parties who reach an agreement in regard to a claim for injury or death under this chapter agree to the payment of attorney fees, and the agreement in regard to a claim for injury or death does not require board approval under AS

23.30.012

.

History.

(§ 26(2) ch 193 SLA 1959; am §§ 63, 64 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am § 20 ch 91 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, subsection (b) was reorganized to add paragraphs; paragraph (b)(2) was enacted as subsection (c) and renumbered at that time.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 22, 2018, added (c) [now (b)(2)].

Sec. 23.30.263.
Immunity from civil liability for workplace safety inspections.

An employer’s safety inspector is not liable for civil damages for an injury to an employee of that employer resulting from an act or omission in performing or failing to perform a loss control service, a workplace safety inspection, or a safety advisory service provided in connection with an employer’s workers’ compensation insurance coverage, unless the act or failure to act constitutes intentional misconduct. In this section, “safety inspector” means

a carrier and an employee or agent of the carrier;

a trade association of which the employer is a member; or

a person providing adjusting or inspection services to an employer who is a member of an association established under AS

21.76.010

or to an employer who is self-insured under AS

23.30.090

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1995)

Sec. 23.30.265.
[Renumbered as AS 23.30.395.]

Sec. 23.30.270.
[Renumbered as AS 23.30.400.]

Sec. 23.30.280.
Investigation of fraud; staffing.

The director shall establish a section within the division for the investigation of fraudulent or misleading acts under AS

23.30.250

and other fraudulent acts relating to workers’ compensation.

The director may investigate facts reported under this section and may refer facts indicating a possible violation of law to the appropriate prosecutor or agency. If the director determines that there is credible evidence that a person obtained a payment, compensation, medical treatment, or other benefit provided under this chapter by a fraudulent act or false or misleading statement or representation as provided in AS

23.30.250(a)

, the director shall notify the affected employer, insurer, and adjuster upon conclusion of the investigation. If the fraudulent act or false or misleading statement or representation was perpetrated against the division, the director may file a petition as provided in AS

23.30.110

for an order of forfeiture against the person, precluding, in whole or in part, the person from future payment, compensation, medical treatment, or other benefit provided under this chapter.

The director shall establish a toll-free fraud hotline to receive calls relating to fraudulent or misleading acts under this chapter. The director shall publicize the availability of the toll-free fraud hotline and encourage the public to provide information to the division relating to fraudulent or misleading acts relating to workers’ compensation.

The section established by the director under (a) of this section shall include not less than two full-time investigators with the primary responsibility of investigating fraudulent or misleading acts relating to workers’ compensation. The director shall also ensure that there are sufficient personnel to staff the toll-free fraud hotline established under (c) of this section.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, a person is not liable for civil damages for filing a report concerning a suspected, anticipated, or completed fraudulent act or a false or misleading statement or representation with, or for furnishing other information, whether written or oral, concerning a suspected, anticipated, or completed fraudulent act or false or misleading statements or representation to

law enforcement officials or their agents and employees;

the division of workers’ compensation, the division of insurance in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, or an agency in another state that regulates insurance or workers’ compensation;

an insurer or adjuster or its agents, employees, or designees, or the risk manager of a self-insured employer under this chapter.

The provisions of (e) of this section do not preclude liability for civil damages as described in (e) of this section if the liability arose as a result of gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct.

The papers, reports, documents, and evidence received under this section or in an investigation arising from information received under this section are not subject to public inspection for so long as the director considers confidentiality to be in the public interest or reasonably necessary to complete an investigation or protect the person investigated from unwarranted injury. Papers, reports, documents, and other evidence related to an investigation under this section are confidential.

If the material that the director seeks to obtain is located outside the state, the material may be made available to the director to examine at the place where the material is located. The director may designate representatives, including officials of the state in which the material is located, to inspect the material on behalf of the director. The director may respond to a request from an official of another state for similar material.

Papers, reports, documents, and other evidence related to an investigation under this section are not subject to subpoena unless, after notice to the director and a hearing, a court determines that the director would not be unduly hindered by public inspection.

History.

(§ 65 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)